Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 4. Foreclosure of Liens.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to execution procedures, see AS 09.35.

Collateral references. —

46 Am. Jur. 2d, Judgments, §§ 342-384

51 Am. Jur. 2d, Liens, § 1 et seq.

53 C.J.S., Liens, § 1 et seq.

Interest of vendee under executory contract as subject to execution, judgment lien, or attachment, 1 ALR2d 727.

Right to require security, as condition of canceling lien of record or of recording payment, 2 ALR2d 1064.

Priority as between lien for repairs and the like, and right of seller under conditional sales contract, 36 ALR2d 198.

Contribution, subrogation, and similar rights, as between cotenants, where one pays the other’s share of sum owing on lien, 48 A.L.R.2d 1305.

Time of conversion of real estate sold under and by court order, 66 ALR2d 1266.

Solid mineral royalty as real or personal property for purposes of lien of judgment, 68 ALR2d 735.

Superiority of special or local assessment lien over earlier private lien or mortgage, where statute creating such special lien is silent as to superiority, 75 ALR2d 1121.

Interest of spouse in estate by entireties as subject to judgment lien in satisfaction of his or her individual debt, 75 ALR2d 1188.

Surviving spouse’s right to contribution, exoneration, or other reimbursement out of decedent’s estate respecting liens on estate by entirety or joint tenancy, 76 A.L.R.2d 1004.

Propriety of accepting check or promissory note in satisfaction of bid at execution or judicial sale for cash, 86 ALR2d 292.

Priorities as between vendor’s lien and subsequent title or security interest obtained in another state to which vehicle was removed, 42 ALR3d 1168.

Right of vendee under executory land contract to lien for amount paid on purchase price as against subsequent creditors of or purchasers from vendor, 82 ALR3d 1040.

Landlord’s remedy by way of distress or lien on defaulting tenant’s property on leased premises as including right to collect for all unpaid utility expenses, 99 ALR3d 1100.

Choice of law as to exemption of property from execution, 100 ALR3d 1235.

Sec. 09.45.170.
Judgment on foreclosure of lien.

A person having a lien upon real property, other than that of a judgment, whether created by mortgage or otherwise, to secure a debt or other obligation may bring an action to foreclose the lien.
In the action, the court may direct the sale of the encumbered property or a portion of it and the application of the proceeds of the sale to the payment of costs, expenses of sale, and the amount due the plaintiff. The judgment shall also determine the personal liability of a defendant for the payment of the debt secured by the lien and be entered accordingly.

History.

(§ 18.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For foreclosure as a bar to nonjudicial remedies under a deed of trust, see AS

34.20.070(a)

.

Sec. 09.45.180.
Sale of encumbered property.

The sale of the encumbered property shall be conducted in the same manner as the sale of real property on execution.
A deficiency between the amount of the judgment and the sale price may be enforced by execution.

History.

(§ 18.02 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.190.
Redemption after foreclosure of lien.

Property sold upon a judgment of foreclosure may be redeemed in the manner and with the effect as real property sold on an execution issued upon a judgment for the payment of an unsecured debt.

History.

(§ 18.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.200.
Effect of action to recover debt.

During or after the pendency of an action for the recovery of a debt secured by a lien mentioned in AS

09.45.170

, an action cannot be maintained for the foreclosure of the lien unless judgment is given in that action that the plaintiff recover the debt or a part of it, and an execution issued in the action against the property of the defendant is returned unsatisfied in whole or in part.

History.

(§ 18.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For judgment on the debt as a bar to nonjudicial remedies under a deed of trust, see AS

34.20.070(a)

; for notice required in notes executed after May 24, 1988, that are secured by a deed of trust or mortgage, see AS

34.20.160

.

Sec. 09.45.210.
Proceedings when debt secured is not all due.

When an action is commenced to foreclose a lien by which a debt is secured, which debt is payable in installments either of interest or principal, and any of the installments is not then due, the court shall adjudge a foreclosure of the lien, and may also adjudge a sale of the property for the satisfaction of the whole of the debt or so much of it as may be necessary to satisfy the installment then due, with costs of action.
In the latter case the judgment of foreclosure as to the remainder of the property may be enforced by an order of sale, in whole or in part, whenever default is made in the payment of the installments not then due.

History.

(§ 18.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.45.220.
Effect of payment before judgment or sale.

If, before a judgment is given, the amount then due, with the costs of action, is brought into court and paid to the clerk, the action shall be dismissed, and, if the same be done after judgment and before sale, the effect of the judgment as to the amount then due and paid shall be terminated and the execution, if any have issued, be recalled by the clerk.
When an installment not due is adjudged to be paid, the court shall determine and specify in the judgment what sum shall be received in satisfaction thereof, which sum may be equal to the installment or otherwise, according to the present value thereof.

History.

(§ 18.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)